zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 管道 > 管道设备 > 水槽 > 厨房水槽/水池: 嵌入式水槽; 农舍水槽; 台下水槽
hr-HR: Željezarija > Vodoinstalaterska oprema > Sanitarna keramika i slavine > Umivaonici > Kuhinjski i pomoćni sudoperi: Ugradbeni umivaonici; Rustikalni umivaonici; Podgradni umivaonici
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > ระบบท่อประปา > ที่ติดตั้งท่อ > อ่างล้างหน้า > อ่างน้ำสำหรับครัว: อ่างล้างจานแบบดรอปอิน; อ่างล้างจานบ้านไร่; อ่างล้างหน้าแบบฝังข้างใต้
ro-RO: Feronerie > Instalații sanitare > Corpuri sanitare > Chiuvete > Chiuvete de bucătărie și chiuvete utilitare: Chiuvete încastrate; Chiuvete rustice; Chiuvete montate sub blat
tr: Hırdavat > Sıhhi tesisat > Sıhhi Tesisat Armatürleri > Lavabolar > Mutfak ve Yıkama Evyeleri: Açılır Evyeler; Çiftlik Evi Evyeleri; Alttan Montajlı Lavabolar
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Prodotti idraulici > Articoli idraulici > Lavandini > Lavandini cucina: Lavelli da incasso; Lavelli per fattoria; Lavelli sottopiano
fi: Rakentaminen > Putkityöt > Putkiston kiinnikkeet > Altaat > Keittiö- ja pesualtaat: Kulma-altaat; Reunaan asennettavat altaat; Alta kiinnitettävät altaat
sv: Metallprodukter > Rörmokeri > Sanitära produkter > Tvättställ > Diskhoar: Drop-in-diskhoar; Bondgårdsdiskhoar; Undermonterade diskhoar
da: Isenkram > Sanitet > Sanitetsinstallationer > Vaske > Køkkenvaske og arbejdsvaske: Åbne håndvaske; Husvaske; Undermonterede vaske
hu: Hardver > Vízvezeték > Vízvezeték-szerelvények > Mosogatók > Konyhai és használati mosdókagylók: Behelyezhető mosdókagylók; Parasztház-mosdókagyló; Alulra szerelt mosdókagylók
vi: Phần cứng > Đường ống > Thiết bị kỹ thuật vệ sinh > Chậu rửa > Chậu bếp & Bồn rửa chén bát: Chậu rửa âm bàn; Chậu rửa trang trại; Chậu rửa lắp âm
ko: 철물 > 배관 > 배관설비 > 개수대 > 주방/다목적 개수대: 매립형 개수대; 팜하우스 싱크볼; 매립형 세면대
pl: Sprzęt > Systemy hydrauliczne > Armatury > Zlewy i umywalki > Zlewy kuchenne i użytkowe: Zlewy wpuszczane; Zlewy w stylu farmhouse; Umywalki podblatowe
fr: Quincaillerie > Plomberie > Équipements sanitaires > Éviers et lavabos > Éviers & Plonges: Éviers encastrables; Éviers de ferme; Éviers sous plan
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы водоснабжения и водоотведения > Сантехника > Раковины > Кухонные и хозяйственные раковины: Врезные раковины; Раковины с передним бортиком; Раковины подстольного монтажа
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Vodovod > Sanitarna oprema > Umivalniki > Kuhinjska korita in korita za tehnični prostor: Vgradna korita; Korita v podeželskem slogu; Podpultna korita
pt-PT: Equipamento > Canalização > Fixações de canalização > Lavatórios > Lava-louças de cozinha e utilitários: Lavatórios suspensos; Lavatórios de fazenda; Lavatórios de fixação inferior
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Santechnika > Santechninė įranga > Kriauklės > Virtuvės ir komunalinės kriauklės: Įleidžiamos kriauklės; Sodybos kriauklės; Iš apačios montuojamos kriauklės
nb: Maskinvare > Rørlegging > Rørleggerarmaturer > Vasker > Kjøkken- og bruksvasker: Innfallsvasker; Gårdsvasker; Undermonterte vasker
es: Bricolaje > Fontanería > Piezas para fontanería > Lavabos y fregaderos > Fregaderos: Fregaderos para instalar; Fregaderos de granja; Fregaderos bajo encimera
en: Hardware > Plumbing > Plumbing Fixtures > Sinks > Kitchen & Utility Sinks: Drop-In Sinks; Farmhouse Sinks; Undermount Sinks
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Sanitär > Sanitärkeramik & Armaturen > Waschbecken & Spülen > Küchenspülen & Spülbecken: Einbauwaschbecken; Waschbecken im Bauernhausstil; Unterbauwaschbecken
pt-BR: Ferragens > Encanamento > Instalações de encanamento > Pias > Pias de cozinha: Pias suspensas; Pias encastradas; Pias de encastrar
ja: DIY用品 > 水道設備 > 排水・配管設備 > シンク > キッチンシンク: ドロップインシンク; ファームハウスシンク; アンダーマウントシンク
bg-BG: Железария > Водоснабдяване и канализация > Санитарно обзавеждане > Мивки > Кухненски мивки: Вграждащи се мивки; Мивки във фермерски стил; Мивки за вграждане под плот
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Loodgieterswerk > Sanitair > Gootstenen > Gootstenen voor keukens: Inbouwgootstenen; Gootstenen voor boerderijen; Onderbouwgootstenen
sk-SK: Náradie > Vodoinštalačné práce > Vodovodné armatúry > Umývadlá > Kuchynské a univerzálne drezy: Vstavané dresy; Rustikálne dresy; Zapustené dresy
zh-TW: 硬體 > 管線 > 管線設備 > 水槽 > 廚房水槽/多功能水槽: 嵌入式水槽; 美式前置水槽; 台下水槽
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Vodoinstalace > Instalatérské armatury > Dřezy a umyvadla > Kuchyňské dřezy: Vestavné dřezy; Dřezy s viditelnou přední stranou; Zápustná umyvadla
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Υδραυλικές εγκαταστάσεις > Υδραυλικά είδη > Νεροχύτες/νιπτήρες > Νεροχύτες κουζίνας & γενικής χρήσης: Νεροχύτες τοποθέτησης; Νεροχύτες αγροικίας; Ενσωματωμένοι νεροχύτες